test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UU_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - k'ajúu - ENGLISH : # CLASS_UU_STEM_2

     k'ajúu+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k'ajáawaa
     k'ajúu+V+INDIRECT+PAST: k'ajáawaan
     k'ajúu+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k'ajáawaas
     k'ajúu+V+NON_FACTIVE: k'ajáawang
     k'ajúu+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k'ajáawaa.ang
     k'ajúu+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k'ajáawang k̲asa'áa
     k'ajúu+V+NEAR+FUTURE: k'ajáawang k̲asa'áang
     k'ajúu+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k'ajáawang k̲asaasdláa
     k'ajúu+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k'ajáawang k̲asaasdláang
     k'ajúu+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k'ajáaw'ahlans
     k'ajúu+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: k'ajáawaa'ahlang
     k'ajúu+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k'ajáawaa'ahlanggaa
     k'ajúu+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k'ajáawaa'ahlanggang
     k'ajúu+V+REFLEXIVE: k'ajáaw'ahl
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k'ajáawang k̲asaa'áng
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k'ajáawang k̲asaa'ánggang
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k'ajáawang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     k'ajúu+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k'ajáawang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
